Tennessee, session 114, HB1534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "Title V funds" means funding received from the
federal Title V maternal and child health services block grant.
(b) The commissioner of health is authorized to utilize, to the extent allowed
under federal law, available Title V funds to establish a program that provides funds to
women whose pregnancies have ended in stillbirth. The purpose of the program must
be to:
(1) Offset a woman's costs of burial or other disposition of the woman's
stillborn child's remains; and
(2) Support educational scholarships that may be awarded by the
department to women who have experienced a pregnancy that ended in stillbirth.
(c) The commissioner may seek an authorization, waiver, or other permission
the commissioner determines is necessary to effectuate subsection (b).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1534
009707
- 1 -